Ohio, session 136, SB204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1923.06 be amended and section 5
1923.111 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 1923.06. (A) Any summons in an action, including a 7
claim for possession, pursuant to this chapter shall be issued, 8
be in the form specified, and be served and returned as provided 9
in this section. Such service shall be at least seven days 10
before the day set for trial. 11
(B) Every summons issued under this section to recover 12
residential premises shall contain both of the following: 13
(1) The following language printed in a conspicuous 14
manner: "A complaint to evict you has been filed with this 15
court. No person shall be evicted unless the person's right to 16
possession has ended and no person shall be evicted in 17
retaliation for the exercise of the person's lawful rights. If 18
you are depositing rent with the clerk of this court you shall 19
continue to deposit such rent until the time of the court 20

S. B. No. 204 Page 2
As Introduced
hearing. The failure to continue to deposit such rent may result 21
in your eviction. You may request a trial by jury. You have the 22
right to seek legal assistance. If you cannot afford a lawyer, 23
you may contact your local legal aid or legal service office. If 24
none is available, you may contact your local bar association." 25
(2) A statement in bold-face type notifying the defendant 26
of both of the following: 27
(a) Any records associated with the action are suppressed 28
and not accessible to the public until an order is entered 29
granting the plaintiff possession of the premises. 30
(b) If the plaintiff is granted possession of the 31
premises, the court records may remain private if both parties 32
agree to suppress the records. 33
(C) The clerk of the court in which a complaint to evict 34
is filed shall mail any summons by ordinary mail, along with a 35
copy of the complaint, document, or other process to be served, 36
to the defendant at the address set forth in the caption of the 37
summons and to any address set forth in any written instructions 38
furnished to the clerk. The mailing shall be evidenced by a 39
certificate of mailing which the clerk shall complete and file. 40
In addition to this ordinary mail service, the clerk also 41
shall cause service of that process to be completed under either 42
of the following: 43
(1) Division (D) or (E) of this section or both, depending 44
upon which of those two methods of service is requested by the 45
plaintiff upon filing the complaint to evict; 46
(2) Division (F) of this section if the action relates to 47
a deceased manufactured home park resident. 48

S. B. No. 204 Page 3
As Introduced
(D)(1) If requested, the clerk shall deliver sufficient 49
copies of the summons, complaint, document, or other process to 50
be served to, and service shall be made by, one of the following 51
persons: 52
(a) The sheriff of the county in which the premises are 53
located when the process issues from a court of common pleas or 54
county court; 55
(b) The bailiff of the court for service when process 56
issues from a municipal court; 57
(c) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older, who 58
is not a party, and who has been designated by order of the 59
court to make service of process when process issues from any of 60
the courts referred to in divisions (D)(1)(a) and (b) of this 61
section. 62
(2) The person serving process shall effect service at the 63
premises that are the subject of the forcible entry and detainer 64
action by one of the following means: 65
(a) By locating the person to be served at the premises to 66
tender a copy of the process and accompanying documents to that 67
person; 68
(b) By leaving a copy of the summons, complaint, document, 69
or other process with a person of suitable age and discretion 70
found at the premises if the person to be served cannot be found 71
at the time the person making service attempts to serve the 72
summons pursuant to division (D)(2)(a) of this section; 73
(c) By posting a copy in a conspicuous place on the 74
subject premises if service cannot be made pursuant to divisions 75
(D)(2)(a) and (b) of this section. 76

S. B. No. 204 Page 4
As Introduced
(3) Within five days after receiving the summons, 77
complaint, document, or other process from the clerk for 78
service, the person making service shall return the process to 79
the clerk. The person shall indicate on the process which method 80
described in division (D)(2) of this section was used to serve 81
the summons. The clerk shall make the appropriate entry on the 82
appearance docket. 83
(E) If requested, the clerk shall mail by certified mail, 84
return receipt requested, a copy of the summons, complaint, 85
document, or other process to be served to the address set forth 86
in the caption of the summons and to any address set forth in 87
any written instructions furnished to the clerk. 88
(F)(1) If the person to be evicted in an action pursuant 89
to this chapter is a deceased manufactured home park resident, 90
the plaintiff shall provide to the clerk the following 91
information: 92
(a) If the plaintiff knows that a probate court has 93
granted letters testamentary or of administration for the estate 94
of the deceased resident, the name and address of the probate 95
court, the case number of the estate, and the name and address 96
of the executor or administrator appointed by the probate court; 97
(b) If the plaintiff knows that a probate court has not 98
granted letters testamentary or of administration for the estate 99
of the deceased resident or does not know whether or not a 100
probate court has granted letters testamentary or of 101
administration for the estate, the names and addresses of the 102
deceased resident's spouse and any other members of the deceased 103
resident's immediate family that are known to the plaintiff; 104
(c) If the plaintiff does not possess the information set 105

S. B. No. 204 Page 5
As Introduced
forth in division (F)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, an affidavit 106
from the plaintiff stating that the plaintiff does not possess 107
the information. 108
(2)(a) Upon receipt from the plaintiff of the information 109
set forth in division (F)(1)(a) of this section, the clerk shall 110
mail by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the 111
summons, complaint, document, or other process to be served to 112
the address of the executor or administrator appointed by the 113
probate court. 114
(b) Upon receipt from the plaintiff of the information set 115
forth in division (F)(1)(b) or (c) of this section, the clerk 116
shall do both of the following: 117
(i) Mail by ordinary mail and by certified mail, return 118
receipt requested, a copy of the summons, complaint, document, 119
or other process to be served to the persons and addresses 120
provided by the plaintiff, if any. The ordinary mail mailing 121
shall be evidenced by a certificate of mailing that the clerk 122
shall complete and file. 123
(ii) Cause service of notice to be made by publication in 124
a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the 125
complaint is filed. The publication shall set forth the name and 126
address of the court, the case number, the name and address of 127
the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and the name and 128
address of the deceased manufactured home park resident. The 129
publication shall describe the premises entered upon and 130
detained, shall contain a summary statement of the object of the 131
eviction complaint against the deceased resident, and shall 132
state that the claim for restitution of the premises shall be 133
scheduled for a hearing in accordance with local court rules, 134
but in no event sooner than the seventh day from the date 135

S. B. No. 204 Page 6
As Introduced
service is complete. The clerk shall cause the publication to be 136
published at least once a week for two weeks. 137
(G) Service of process shall be deemed complete on the 138
date that any of the following has occurred: 139
(1) Service is made pursuant to division (D)(2)(a) or (b) 140
of this section. 141
(2) Both ordinary mail service under division (C) and 142
service by posting pursuant to division (D)(2)(c) of this 143
section have been made. 144
(3) For service performed pursuant to division (E) or (F) 145
(2)(a) of this section, on the date of mailing, if on the date 146
of the hearing either of the following applies: 147
(a) The certified mail has not been returned for any 148
reason other than refused or unclaimed. 149
(b) The certified mail has not been endorsed, and the 150
ordinary mail has not been returned. 151
(4) For service performed under division (F)(2)(b) of this 152
section, on the date of mailing under division (F)(2)(b)(i) of 153
this section or on the date of the last publication under 154
division (F)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, whichever is later, if 155
on the date of the hearing, either of the following applies: 156
(a) The certified mail has not been returned for any 157
reason other than refused or unclaimed. 158
(b) The certified mail has not been endorsed, and the 159
ordinary mail has not been returned. 160
(H)(1) The claim for restitution of the premises shall be 161
scheduled for hearing in accordance with local court rules, but 162

S. B. No. 204 Page 7
As Introduced
in no event sooner than the seventh day from the date service is 163
complete. 164
(2) Answer day for any other claims filed with the claim 165
for possession shall be twenty-eight days from the date service 166
is deemed complete under this section. 167
(I) As used in this section, "immediate family" means a 168
person's spouse, brothers and sisters of the whole or half 169
blood, children, including adopted children and stepchildren, 170
parents, and grandparents. 171
Sec. 1923.111. (A) For purposes of this section, 172
"suppressed court record" means a court record that is 173
accessible only to the following: 174
(1) Judges; 175
(2) Court staff; 176
(3) A party to the case; 177
(4) A party's attorney, if applicable; 178
(5) Authorized judicial department staff; 179
(6) A person with a valid court order authorizing access 180
to the court record. 181
(B) Upon the commencement of an action under this chapter, 182
a court shall make any court record of the action a suppressed 183
court record. 184
(C) If a plaintiff prevails on the merits in the action, 185
the record under division (B) of this section is no longer a 186
suppressed court record, and the court shall make the record 187
available to the public unless the parties to the action agree 188
that the record shall remain suppressed. If the parties agree 189

S. B. No. 204 Page 8
As Introduced
that the record shall remain suppressed, the record remains a 190
suppressed court record. 191
(D) Any court record of the action under division (B) of 192
this section shall remain a suppressed court record when either 193
of the following applies: 194
(1) The action was dismissed. 195
(2) Judgment was granted for the defendant in the action. 196
(E) Nothing in this section prevents the names of the 197
parties included in a court record that is suppressed pursuant 198
to this section from being used by the court for administrative 199
purposes. The court shall not publish the names of the parties 200
online. 201
Section 2. That existing section 1923.06 of the Revised 202
Code is hereby repealed. 203